California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The Department of the Youth Authority may notify the Controller of any county or counties that have experienced an increase in the rate of commitments for purposes of recovering the costs associated with that increase. Upon receiving this notice, the Controller shall redirect, from the funds that are provided to that county or counties pursuant to Section 17602, an amount equal to the costs associated with the increased commitments. Within 30 days of the notification of the Controller the Department of the Youth Authority shall also notify each county from which they are seeking reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

The wards committed to ranches, camps, or forestry camps may be required to labor on the buildings and grounds thereof, on the making of forest roads for fire prevention or firefighting, on forestation or reforestation of public lands, or on the making of firetrails or firebreaks, or to perform any other work or engage in any studies or activities on or off of the grounds of those ranches, camps, or forestry camps prescribed by the probation department, subject to such approval as the county board of supervisors by ordinance requires.

Wards may not be required to labor in fire suppression when under the age of 16 years.

Wards between the ages of 16 years and 18 years may be required to labor in fire suppression if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The parent or guardian of the ward has given permission for that labor by the ward.

(b) The ward has completed 80 hours of training in forest firefighting and fire safety, including, but not limited to, the handling of equipment and chemicals, survival techniques, and first aid.

Whenever any ward committed to a camp is engaged in fire prevention work or the suppression of existing fires, he or she shall be subject to worker’s compensation benefits to the same extent as a county employee, and the board of supervisors shall provide and cover any ward committed to a camp while performing that service, with accident, death and compensation insurance as is otherwise regularly provided for employees of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

The board of supervisors may provide for the payment of wages and pay such wages from the treasury of such county to the wards for the work they do, the sums earned to be paid in reparation, or to the parents or dependents of the ward, or to the ward himself, in such manner and in such proportions as the court directs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

885.

(a) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall adopt and prescribe the minimum standards of construction, operation, programs of education and training, and qualifications of personnel for juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps established under Section 881.

(b) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall conduct a biennial inspection of each juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp situated in this state in accordance with Section 209 that, during the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement of any minor for more than 24 hours.

(c) The custodian of each juvenile
 ranch, camp, or forestry camp shall make any reports that may be required by the board to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 31.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

886.

Except as provided in Section 886.5, no juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp established pursuant to the provisions of this article shall receive or contain more than 100 children at any one time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

886.5.

(a) A juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp may receive or contain a maximum of 125 children at any one time if the county has determined that there is a consistent need for juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp placements which exceeds the beds available in the county. Any county desiring to expand the capacity of a juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp pursuant to this section shall certify to the Board of Corrections that the facility to be expanded will continue to meet the minimum standards adopted and prescribed pursuant to Section 885 during the period of expanded capacity.

(b) (1) The Legislature reaffirms its belief that juvenile ranches, camps, forestry camps, and other residential treatment facilities should be small enough to provide individualized guidance and treatment for juvenile offenders which enables them to return to their families and communities as productive and law abiding citizens. Consistent with this principle and upon demonstration of exceptional need, a juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp may receive or contain a maximum population in excess of 125 children at any one time if the Board of Corrections has approved that expanded capacity pursuant to the following procedure:

(A) The county shall submit an application to the Board of Corrections, endorsed by the board of supervisors, identifying the capacity requested and the reasons why the additional capacity is needed. The application shall include the county’s plan to ensure that the facility will, with the additional capacity, comply with applicable minimum standards and maintain adequate levels of onsite staffing, program, and other services for children in the facility.

(B) The Board of Corrections shall review any application received under this subdivision and shall approve or deny the application based on a determination whether the county has demonstrated its ability to comply with minimum standards and maintain adequate staffing, program, and service levels for children in the expanded facility. In its review, the board shall consider any public comment that may be submitted while the application is pending. The board may approve an application with conditions, including a capacity below the requested number, remodeling or expansion of units or living quarters, staffing ratios in excess of those required by minimum standards, or other adjustments of program or procedure deemed appropriate by the board for a facility operating with a capacity in excess of 125 children. The board shall ensure that the staffing, program, and service levels are increased commensurate with the increased risks to residents and the staff that are a result of the expanded capacity.

(2) Notwithstanding the inspection schedule set forth in Section 885, the board shall conduct an annual inspection of any facility whose application for expanded capacity under this subdivision is approved. The approval to operate at a capacity above 125 children shall terminate, and the facility shall not thereafter receive or contain more than 125 children, if the board determines after any annual inspection that the facility is not in compliance with minimum standards, that program, staffing, or service levels for children in the expanded facility have not been maintained, or that the county has failed substantially to comply with a condition that was attached to the board’s approval of the expanded capacity.

(c) The board may provide forms and instructions to local jurisdictions to facilitate compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

888.

Any county establishing a juvenile ranch or camp under the provisions of this article may, by mutual agreement, accept children committed to that ranch or camp by the juvenile court of another county in the state. Two or more counties may, by mutual agreement, establish juvenile ranches or camps, and the rights granted and duties imposed by this article shall devolve upon those counties acting jointly. The provisions of this article shall not apply to any juvenile hall.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

889.

The board of education shall provide for the administration and operation of public schools in any juvenile hall, day center, ranch, camp, regional youth educational facility, or Orange County youth correctional center in existence and providing services prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section made by the Statutes of 1989, established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of the Education Code, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

889.1.

(a) (1)   Minors detained in or committed to a juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp shall be provided with access to computer technology and the Internet for the purposes of education.

(2) Minors detained in or committed to a juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp may be provided with access to computer technology and the Internet for maintaining relationships with family.

(b) This section does not limit the authority of the chief probation officer, or his or her designee, to limit or deny access to computer technology or the Internet for safety and security or staffing reasons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 997, Sec. 4.   (AB 2448)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

889.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that juveniles with a high school diploma or California high school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a secure youth treatment facility, juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp shall have access to rigorous postsecondary academic and career technical education programs that fulfill the requirements for transfer to the University of California and the California State University and prepare them for career entry, respectively.

(b) (1) A county probation department in collaboration with a county office of education, and in partnership with the California Community Colleges or the California State University, or in voluntary partnership the University of California, shall ensure
 that juveniles with a high school diploma or California high school equivalency certificate who are detained in, or committed to, a secure youth treatment facility, juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp have access to, and can choose to participate in, public postsecondary academic and career technical courses and programs, including courses and programs offered online through asynchronous and synchronous instruction or in-person instruction, and for which they are eligible based on eligibility criteria and course schedules of the in-county, to the extent possible, public postsecondary education campus providing the course or program. County probation departments, in coordination with county offices of education, may use juvenile court school classrooms and computers, in accordance with agreements entered into pursuant to Section 48646 of the Education Code, for the purpose of implementing this section. County probation departments are also encouraged to develop other educational partnerships with local
 public postsecondary campuses, as is feasible, to provide programs on campus and onsite at the secure youth treatment facility, juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp and, to the extent offered by a California community college, the California State University, or the University of California, the probation department, in collaboration with the county office of education, shall ensure that juveniles have access to programs and dual enrollment options offered on campus and onsite at the secure youth treatment facility, juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp.

(2) These programs shall be considered part of the current responsibilities of the county probation department to provide and coordinate services for juveniles that enable the juveniles to be law-abiding and productive members of their families and communities.

(c) For purposes of this section, “juvenile” means any person
 detained in, or committed to, a secure youth treatment facility, juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp.

(d) This section does not preclude juvenile court school pupils who have not yet completed their high school graduation requirements from concurrently participating in postsecondary academic and career technical education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 93.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for that purpose, the Youth Authority shall share in the cost pursuant to this article of the construction of juvenile ranch camps or forestry camps established after July 1, 1957, and for construction at existing juvenile ranches, camps, or forestry camps, by counties that apply therefor.

(b) “Construction,” as used in this section, includes construction of new buildings and acquisition of existing buildings and initial equipment of any of those buildings; and, to the extent provided for in regulations adopted by the Department of the Youth Authority, remodeling of existing buildings owned by the county, to serve the purposes of a juvenile ranch camp or forestry camp, and initial equipment thereof. “Construction” also includes payments made by a county under any lease-purchase agreement or similar arrangement authorized by law and payments for the necessary repair or improvements of property which is leased from the federal government or other public entity without cost to the county for a term of not less than 10 years. It does not include architects’ fees or the cost of land acquisition.

(c) The amount of state assistance that shall be provided to any county shall not exceed 50 percent of the project cost approved by the Youth Authority, and, in no event shall it exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per bed unit of the new juvenile ranch, camp, or forestry camp or per bed unit added to an existing juvenile ranch camp, or forestry camp, as the case may be. The construction project shall be deemed to have as many bed units as the number of persons it is designed to accommodate, not exceeding 100 bed units for any one project.

(d) Application for state assistance for construction funds under this article shall be made to the Youth Authority in the manner and form prescribed by the Youth Authority. The Youth Authority shall prescribe the time and manner of payment of state assistance, if granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative upon repeal of Article 7 (commencing with Section 1805), pursuant to Stats. 1978, Ch. 464, Sec. 10.   Note: Article 7 was repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 288.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for that purpose, the Youth Authority shall provide state assistance pursuant to this section to defray, in whole or part, the cost of construction of border check station facilities by any city which applies therefor.

“City” as used in this section means any city with a population in excess of 500,000 as determined by the last decennial census, all or part of the boundaries of which are contiguous with the boundaries of a foreign country adjoining this state.

(b) “Construction,” as used in this section, includes construction of new buildings and acquisition of existing buildings and initial equipment of any such buildings to serve as a border check station facility. It does not include the cost of land acquisition.

(c) The amount of state assistance which shall be provided to any city shall not exceed 100 percent of the project cost approved by the Youth Authority, and, in no event shall it exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for any one project.

(d) Application for state assistance for construction funds under this section shall be made to the Youth Authority in the manner and form prescribed by the Youth Authority. The Youth Authority shall prescribe the time and manner of payment of state assistance, if granted.

(e) The Youth Authority shall adopt and prescribe the minimum standards of construction for such border check station facility. No city shall be entitled to receive any state funds provided for in this section unless and until the minimum standards and qualifications referred to in this section are complied with by such city. Type and standards of construction shall be approved by the city architect’s office, city department of public works, or such city department having jurisdiction over public construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

893.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county with a population of five million or more may provide and maintain a school or schools at a juvenile ranch or camp or residential or nonresidential boot camp under the control of the probation officer for the purpose of meeting the special educational needs of wards and dependent children of the juvenile court. The school or schools shall be conducted in a manner and under conditions that will minister to the specific individualized educational and training needs of each ward and dependent child in furtherance of the objective of assisting each of them, as much as possible, to fulfill his or her potential to be a contributing, law-abiding member of society. If the board of supervisors determines that this objective may be promoted as well as or better by provision of educational and training services by a qualified private organization, the board of supervisors on behalf of the county may enter into annual contracts, with or without options to renew, for the provision of those services by that organization.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and determines that there are persons whose educational and vocational backgrounds and personal leadership qualities peculiarly fit them to instruct and train wards of the court in promotion of the aforesaid objective, but who lack certification qualifications. Accordingly, the probation officer is hereby authorized to certify to the county board of education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction that a person employed or to be employed by the probation officer or by an organization retained by contract to provide vocational training or vocational training courses at or in connection with the school or schools is peculiarly fit to provide wards of the court that vocational training in promotion of the aforesaid objective.

The certification shall specify the type or types of service the person is qualified to provide. Upon filing of that certification, the person shall be deemed to be a certificated employee for purposes of authorizing him or her to provide the services described in the certificate and for apportionment purposes.

(c) The individual school or schools shall have a maximum enrollment of 100 students.

(d) The county superintendent of schools shall report on behalf of the county the average daily attendance for the schools and classes maintained by the county in the school or schools in the manner provided in Sections 41601 and 84701 of the Education Code and other provisions of law.

(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall compute the amount of allowance to be made to the county by reasons of the average daily attendance at the school or schools by multiplying the average daily attendance by the foundation program amount for a high school district that has an average daily attendance of 301 or more during the fiscal year, and shall make allowances based thereon and shall apportion to the county, the allowances so computed in the same manner and at the same times as would be done with respect to allowances and apportionments to the county school service fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 24.5. Regional Youth Educational Facilities [894. - 898.]

894.

In order to provide a sentencing alternative for the juvenile courts, one or more pilot regional youth educational facilities shall be established as short-term intensive residential programs to which primarily 16- and 17-year-old minor juvenile court wards not committed to the Youth Authority who fit the description in Section 602 may be committed. Participating minors shall be those who are awaiting out-of-home placement in county juvenile halls, educationally behind in school, educable, able to participate in vocational activities, and able to participate in work projects. Each facility shall provide a short-term intensive educational experience, including program elements such as competency-based education services, assessment for learning disabilities including visual perceptual screening and treatment, remedial individual educational plans for diagnosed learning disabilities, electronic and computer education, physical education, vocational and industrial arts and training, job training and experience, character education, victim awareness, and restitution. Wards who complete the short-term intensive program who need continuing services shall be transferred to local facilities for up to 60 days of additional education and training. Following institutional placement, all wards in the program shall receive intensive supervision by a probation officer in their county of residence for a minimum of 120 days. Intensive supervision means a 10 to 15 person caseload per deputy probation officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1455, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

895.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for that purpose, the Youth Authority shall assist counties in the establishment of pilot regional youth educational facilities. Interested counties that agree to provide matching funds or resources, in compliance with standards established by the department, may enter agreements with the Youth Authority to establish these facilities. The facilities shall be operated by participating counties, either solely or under a joint powers agreement. The counties may contract with private agencies to provide job training consultation or other services.

(b) The Youth Authority shall develop selection criteria for participating counties to include, but not be limited to, all of the following factors:

(1) Eligible target population.

(2) Demonstrated ability to administer the program.

(3) Facility capability.

(4) Financial ability to provide matching funds or resources.

(5) Demonstrated need for the program.

(6) Ability to meet regional needs.

(7) Ability to provide specified program elements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1455, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

896.

(a) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall establish minimum performance standards for programs of education and training and for qualifications of personnel for all youth educational facilities in the program, including local continuation and intensive supervision components. These standards and qualifications shall be designed to achieve program goals such as an increase in the educational level of participants, better community protection and offender accountability, and preparation of participants to return to the community as responsible and productive members.

(b) Every person in charge of a regional youth educational facility, which, in the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement, for more than 24
 hours, of any minor, shall certify annually to the board that the facility is in conformity with the standards adopted by the board under subdivision (a). The board may provide forms and instructions to local jurisdictions to facilitate compliance with this subdivision.

(c) The custodian of each regional youth educational facility shall make any reports as may be required by the board to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 298.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

897.

The capacity of each regional youth educational facility shall be established pursuant to Sections 886 and 886.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1455, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

898.

The participating counties shall appoint a citizens advisory committee with a membership drawn from law enforcement, judiciary, probation, education, corrections, business, and the general public, whose function is to review the goals, objectives, and programs of each youth educational facility and provide input to the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1455, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 25. Support of Wards and Dependent Children [900. - 914.]

900.

(a) If it is necessary that provision be made for the expense of support and maintenance of a dependent child of the juvenile court or of a minor person concerning whom a petition has been filed to declare the person a dependent child of the juvenile court in accordance with this chapter, the order providing for the care and custody of the dependent child or other minor person shall direct that the whole expense of support and maintenance of the dependent child or other minor person, up to the amount of twenty dollars ($20) per month, be paid from the county treasury and may direct that an amount up to any maximum amount per month established by the board of supervisors of the county be paid. The board of
 supervisors of each county is hereby authorized to establish, either generally or for individual dependent children or according to classes or groups of dependent children, a maximum amount that the court may order the county to pay for the support and maintenance. All orders made pursuant to this subdivision shall state the amounts to be paid from the county treasury, and those amounts shall constitute legal charges against the county.

(b) If it is necessary that provision be made for the expense of support and maintenance of a ward of the juvenile court or of a minor person concerning whom a petition has been filed to declare the person a ward of the juvenile court in accordance with this chapter, the order providing for the care and custody of the ward or other minor person shall direct that the whole expense of support and
 maintenance of the ward or other minor person be paid from the county treasury. All orders made pursuant to this subdivision shall state the amounts to be paid from the county treasury, and those amounts shall constitute legal charges against the county.

(c) This section is applicable to a minor who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken by the probation department pursuant to Section 330 or 654 and who is temporarily placed out of his home by the probation department, with the approval of the court and the minor’s parent or guardian, for a period not to exceed seven days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 17.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

901.

No order for payment shall be made in a sum in excess of the actual cost of supporting and maintaining the ward, dependent child or other minor person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

(a) If it is found that the maximum amount established by the board of supervisors of the county is insufficient to pay the whole expense of support and maintenance of a dependent child or other minor person, the court may order and direct that the additional amount as is necessary shall be paid out of the earnings, property, or estate of the dependent child or other minor person, or by the parents or guardian of the dependent child or other minor person, or by any other person liable for his or her support and maintenance, to the county officers designated by the board of supervisors, who shall in turn pay it to the person, association, or institution that, under court order, is caring for and maintaining the
 dependent child or other minor person.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 18.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

(a) The father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of a minor, the estate of that person, and the estate of the minor, shall be liable for the reasonable costs of support of the minor while the minor is placed, or detained in, or committed to, any institution or other place pursuant to Section 625 or pursuant to an order of the juvenile court. However, a county shall not levy charges for the costs of support of a minor detained pursuant to Section 625 unless, at the detention hearing, the juvenile court determines that detention of the minor should be continued. The liability of these persons and estates shall be a joint and several liability.

(b) The county
 shall limit the charges it seeks to impose to the reasonable costs of support of the minor and shall exclude any costs of treatment or supervision for the protection of society and the minor and the rehabilitation of the minor. In the event that court-ordered child support paid to the county pursuant to subdivision (a) exceeds the amount of the costs authorized by this subdivision and subdivision (a), the county shall either hold the excess in trust for the minor’s future needs pursuant to Section 302.52 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations or, with the approval of the minor’s caseworker, pay the excess directly to the minor.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to protect the fiscal integrity of the county, to protect persons against whom the county seeks to impose liability from excessive charges,
 to ensure reasonable uniformity throughout the state in the level of liability being imposed, and to ensure that liability is imposed only on persons with the ability to pay. In evaluating a family’s financial ability to pay under this section, the county shall take into consideration the family’s income, the necessary obligations of the family, and the number of persons dependent upon this income. Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4), “costs of support” as used in this section means only actual costs incurred by the county for food and food preparation, clothing, personal supplies, and medical expenses, not to exceed a combined maximum cost of thirty dollars ($30) per day, except that:

(1) The maximum cost of thirty dollars ($30) per day shall be adjusted every third year beginning January 1, 2012, to reflect the percentage
 change in the calendar year annual average of the California Consumer Price Index, All Urban Consumers, published by the Department of Industrial Relations, for the three-year period.

(2) No cost for medical expenses shall be imposed by the county until the county has first exhausted any eligibility the minor may have under private insurance coverage, standard or medically indigent Medi-Cal coverage, and the Robert W. Crown California Children’s Services Act (Article 5 (commencing with Section
 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(3) In calculating the cost of medical expenses, the county shall not charge in excess of 100 percent of the AFDC fee-for-service average Medi-Cal payment for that county for that fiscal year as calculated by the State Department of Health Services; however, if a minor has extraordinary medical or dental costs that are not met under any of the coverages listed in paragraph (2), the county may impose these additional costs.

(4) For those placements of a minor subject to this section in which an AFDC-FC grant is made,
 the local child support agency shall, subject to Sections 17550 and 17552 of the Family Code, seek an order pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code and the statewide child support guideline in effect in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4050) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 9 of the Family Code. For purposes of determining the correct amount of support of a minor subject to this section, the rebuttable presumption set forth in Section 4057 of the Family Code is applicable. This paragraph shall be implemented consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 17415 of the Family Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of the minor, the estate of that person, or the estate of the minor, shall not be liable for the costs described in this section if a petition to declare the
 minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 is dismissed at or before the jurisdictional hearing.

(e) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 19.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.1.

(a) (1) (A) The father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of a minor, the estate of that person, and the estate of the minor, shall be liable for the cost to the county or the court, whichever entity incurred the expenses, of legal services rendered to the minor by an attorney pursuant to an order of the juvenile court.

(B) (i) This paragraph does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of
 supervision undertaken pursuant to Section 654.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), this paragraph applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(2) The father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of a minor and the estate of that person shall also be liable for any cost to the county or the court of legal services rendered directly to the father, mother, or spouse, of the minor or any other person liable for the support of the minor, in a dependency proceeding by an attorney appointed pursuant to an order of the juvenile court. The liability of those persons (in this article called relatives) and estates shall be a joint
 and several liability.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of the minor, the estate of that person, or the estate of the minor, shall not be liable for the costs of any of the legal services provided to any person described in this section if a petition to declare the minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 is dismissed at or before the jurisdictional hearing.

(c) Fees received pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Administrative Office of the Courts in the same manner as prescribed in Section 68085.1 of the Government Code. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall deposit the fees received pursuant to this section into the Trial Court Trust
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 20.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.2.

(a) The juvenile court may require that the father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for the support of a minor, the estate of that person, and the estate of the minor shall be liable for the cost to the county of the home supervision of the minor, pursuant to the order of the juvenile court, by the probation officer or social worker. The liability of these persons (in this article called relatives) and estates shall be a joint and several liability.

(b) Liability shall be imposed on a person pursuant to this section only if he or she has the financial ability to pay. In evaluating a family’s financial ability to pay under this section, the
 county shall take into consideration the family income, the necessary obligations of the family, and the number of persons dependent upon this income.

(c) (1) This section does not apply to a minor who is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court, who is placed on probation pursuant to Section 725, who is the subject of a petition that has been filed to adjudge the minor a ward of the juvenile court, or who is the subject of a program of supervision undertaken pursuant to Section
 654.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section applies to a minor who is designated as a dual status child pursuant to Section 241.1, for purposes of the dependency jurisdiction only and not for purposes of the delinquency jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 22.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

903.25.

(a) In addition to the liability established by any other law, a parent or guardian of a minor who has been delivered to the custody of the probation department, or who has been placed into a children’s receiving home, a foster care home or facility, shall be liable for the reasonable costs of food, shelter, and care of the minor while in the custody of the probation department when all of the following circumstances are applicable:

(1) The parent or guardian receives actual notice by telephone or by written communication from the probation officer that the minor is scheduled for release from custody and that the parent or guardian, in person or
 through a responsible relative, is requested to take delivery of the minor. The notice shall inform the parent or guardian of the financial liability created by this section.

(2) It is reasonably possible for the parent or guardian to take delivery of the minor, in person or through a responsible relative, at the place designated by the probation officer within 12 hours from the time notice of release was received, or within 48 hours from the time notice of release is received in any case where a petition to declare the minor a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 was dismissed at or before the jurisdictional hearing.

(3) The parent states a refusal to take delivery of the minor or fails to make a reasonable effort to take delivery of the minor, in person or through a